Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2310
Out-of-state trust company without instate branch trust office; representative trust offices; authorized; when.

An out-of-state trust company which has not established and does not maintain a branch trust office in this state may establish and maintain representative trust offices in Nebraska only if (1) the requirements of section 8-2311 are met and (2) the home state of the out-of-state trust company authorizes the establishment and maintenance of representative trust offices in that state by a Nebraska trust company under conditions no more restrictive than those imposed by the laws of Nebraska, as determined by the director.

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 63.